Illinois, session 104th, HB3742.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Procurement Bid Ethics Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to prevent 7conflicts of interest in the procurement bidding process for 8units of local government by prohibiting directors, employees, 9investors, or immediate family members of any director, 10employee, or investor of any corporation, organization, or 11entity that operates a procurement bid process for a unit of 12local government from simultaneously submitting and competing 13for a bid in that unit of local government. This Act is 14intended to ensure transparency and accountability in local 15government contracting. 16    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:17    "Director" means an individual serving as a director or 18officer, or in a similar position, in any corporation, 19organization, or entity that directly or indirectly operates a 20procurement bid process for a unit of local government.21    "Employee" means an individual employed by a corporation, 22organization, or entity that directly or indirectly operates a   HB3742- 2 -LRB104 09855 HLH 19923 b1procurement bid process for a unit of local government, 2including a full-time, part-time, and contract employee.3    "Investor" means any individual or entity who holds 4ownership, equity interest, or shares in a corporation, 5organization, or entity that directly or indirectly operates a 6procurement bid process for a unit of local government.7    "Immediate family member" means a spouse, child, parent, 8sibling, or any other relative residing in the same household 9as the individual.10    "Procurement bid process" means the process through which 11a unit of local government solicits, evaluates, and awards 12contracts for goods, services, or construction projects, 13including any bidding, procurement, or contracting procedures.14    "Unit of local government" means any municipality, county, 15school district, park district, library district, or other 16governmental body or agency in the State of Illinois that 17issues procurement bids. 18    Section 15. Prohibition on simultaneous submission and 19bidding.20    (a) No director, employee, investor, or immediate family 21member of any director, employee, or investor of any 22corporation, organization, or entity that directly or 23indirectly operates a procurement bid process for a unit of 24local government shall simultaneously submit and compete for a 25procurement bid in that same unit of local government without   HB3742- 3 -LRB104 09855 HLH 19923 b1formally disclosing that involvement to the Executive Ethics 2Commission.3    (b) The disclosure required by this Section must be 4submitted in writing to the Executive Ethics Commission prior 5to the submission of any bid or proposal for a contract in 6which the individual or entity is involved. The disclosure 7must include the following information:8        (1) the name of the corporation, organization, or 9    entity operating the procurement bid process;10        (2) the names of the directors, employees, investors, 11    and immediate family members who are involved in both the 12    procurement process and submitting the bid;13        (3) the specific procurement contract or opportunity 14    for which the bid is being submitted and the nature of the 15    relationship between the bidding entity and the 16    procurement process operator; and17        (4) any potential conflicts of interest or financial 18    relationships between the bidding entity and the unit of 19    local government administering the procurement. 20    Section 20. Civil penalties for failure to disclose.21    (a) Any individual or entity who fails to make the 22required disclosure in accordance with Section 15 shall be 23subject to a civil penalty of up to $1,000,000.24    (b) The Executive Ethics Commission shall be responsible 25for determining whether a violation has occurred and for   HB3742- 4 -LRB104 09855 HLH 19923 b1imposing the penalty. The penalty shall be levied against the 2corporation, organization, or entity that fails to disclose 3the involvement of its directors, employees, investors, or 4immediate family members in the procurement bid process.5    (c) The civil penalty shall be deposited into the General 6Revenue Fund and may be used for enforcement of procurement 7ethics and other public integrity initiatives. 8    Section 25. Enforcement and penalties.9    (a) The Executive Ethics Commission shall have the 10authority to enforce the provisions of this Act. The 11Commission may investigate complaints, conduct audits, and 12issue subpoenas to enforce compliance.13    (b) Any corporation, organization, or entity that fails to 14comply with the provisions of this Act may be prohibited from 15participating in future procurement processes or contracts 16with any unit of local government for a period of up to 5 17years.18    (c) In addition to the civil penalty imposed under Section 1920, violators may be subject to additional penalties under 20State law, including fines and disqualification from 21participating in any public contracting process. 22    Section 30. Exceptions. 23    (a) This Act does not apply to individuals or entities 24making bids for procurements with units of local government   HB3742- 5 -LRB104 09855 HLH 19923 b1that are not directly involved in the procurement process 2itself.3    (b) The disclosure requirements do not apply to situations 4where the corporation, organization, or entity has no direct 5or indirect control over the procurement bid process. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.